Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6529
Defense contractor, defined.

Defense contractor has the same meaning as in 50 U.S.C. 4552, as such section existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2025, LB649, § 6.
July 1, 2027